Illinois, session 104th, HB1860.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 529-21 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/29-21 new)7    Sec. 29-21. Disclosure of digitally altered content.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Deepfake" means any video recording, motion-picture film, 10sound recording, electronic image, or photograph, or any 11technological representation of speech or conduct 12substantially derivative of any one or more of those forms of 13media:14        (1) that is so realistic that a reasonable person 15    would believe it depicts speech or conduct of an 16    individual who did not in fact engage in such speech or 17    conduct; and18        (2) the production of which was substantially 19    dependent upon technical means rather than the ability of 20    another individual to physically or verbally impersonate 21    the depicted individual.22    "Depicted individual" means an individual in a deepfake 23who appears to be engaging in speech or conduct in which the   HB1860- 2 -LRB104 10831 SPS 20912 b1individual did not engage.2    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b), a person shall 3not distribute, or enter into an agreement with another person 4to distribute, materially deceptive media if:5        (1) the person knows the media falsely represents a 6    depicted individual;7        (2) the distribution occurs within 90 days before an 8    election;9        (3) the person intends the distribution to harm the 10    reputation or electoral prospects of a candidate in an 11    election or otherwise deceive voters; and12        (4) the person intends the distribution to change the 13    voting behavior of electors in an election by deceiving 14    the electors into incorrectly believing that the depicted 15    individual in fact engaged in the speech or conduct 16    depicted, and the distribution is reasonably likely to 17    cause that result.18    (c) The prohibition described in subsection (b) does not 19apply:20        (1) If the media includes a disclaimer informing the 21    viewer that the media has been manipulated by technical 22    means and depicts speech or conduct that did not occur. 23    The following disclaimer is sufficient, but not necessary, 24    to satisfy the requirement of this subsection:25        "This (insert image, audio, or video) has been 26    manipulated by technical means and depicts speech or   HB1860- 3 -LRB104 10831 SPS 20912 b1    conduct that did not occur."2        (2) If the media is a video, the disclaimer satisfies 3    all of the following requirements:4            (A) it appears throughout the entirety of the 5        video;6            (B) it is clearly visible to and readable by an 7        observer;8            (C) it is in letters at least as large as the 9        majority of any text communication, or if there is no 10        other text communication, in a size that is easily 11        readable by the average viewer; and12            (D) it is in the same language as the language used 13        in the video media.14        (3) If the media consists only of audio and contains 15    no image or video, the disclaimer is read at the beginning 16    and end of the media in a clearly spoken manner, in a pitch 17    that can be easily heard by the average listener, and in 18    the same language as the audio media.19        (4) If the media is an image, the disclaimer meets all 20    of the following requirements:21            (A) it is clearly visible to and readable by the 22        average viewer;23            (B) it is in letters at least as large as the 24        majority of the other text, if the media contains 25        other text; and26            (C) it is in the same language as the language used   HB1860- 4 -LRB104 10831 SPS 20912 b1        in the image media.2        (5) If the media includes a citation directing the 3    viewer or listener to the original source from which the 4    unedited version of the existing image, audio, or video 5    was obtained, if the media was generated by editing an 6    existing image, audio, or video.7    (d) A candidate whose appearance, action, or speech is 8depicted through the use of a deceptive and fraudulent 9deepfake in violation of subsection (b) may seek injunctive or 10other equitable relief prohibiting the publication of such 11deceptive and fraudulent deepfake.12    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a 13person who violates subsection (b) commits a Class C 14misdemeanor.15    A person who violates subsection (b) with the intent to 16cause violence or bodily harm commits a Class A misdemeanor.17    A person who violates subsection (b) a second or 18subsequent time within 5 years after a prior conviction for 19violating subsection (b) commits a Class 3 felony.20    (e) This Section does not apply to:21        (1) a radio or television broadcasting station, 22    including a cable or satellite television operator, 23    programmer, or producer, that broadcasts a deceptive and 24    fraudulent deepfake prohibited by this Section as part of 25    a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, or 26    on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events, if the   HB1860- 5 -LRB104 10831 SPS 20912 b1    broadcast clearly acknowledges through content or a 2    disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by 3    the average listener or viewer, that there are questions 4    about the authenticity of the materially deceptive audio 5    or visual media; 6        (2) a radio or television broadcasting station, 7    including a cable or satellite television operator, 8    programmer, or producer, when it is paid to broadcast a 9    deceptive and fraudulent deepfake and has made a good 10    faith effort to establish the depiction is not a deceptive 11    and fraudulent deepfake;12        (3) a website, or a regularly published newspaper, 13    magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, 14    including an Internet or electronic publication, that 15    routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, 16    and that publishes materially deceptive audio or visual 17    media prohibited by this Section, if the publication 18    clearly states that the materially deceptive audio or 19    visual media does not accurately represent the speech or 20    conduct of the candidate; or21        (4) materially deceptive audio or visual media that 22    constitutes satire or parody.23    (f) The provisions of this Section are severable under 24Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.